Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 3. Occupation of Streets and Roads.

§ 56-14.
Streets, etc., of city or town not to be occupied without its consent; compensation.

No public service corporation, cold storage, compressed air, viaduct, conduit, or bridge company, nor any corporation, association, person, or partnership, engaged in these or like enterprises, shall use, cross, or occupy with its works the streets or
alleys, public or private, or the public grounds, of any incorporated city or town, whether along, over or under the same, without the consent of the corporate authorities thereof; and in case any person shall be damaged in his property
by any such use, occupation, or crossing, such corporation, association, person, or partnership shall, before using, crossing, or occupying such streets, alleys or public grounds, make compensation therefor to the person so damaged.
Such compensation, if the parties cannot agree upon the same, shall be ascertained in the mode prescribed in the laws regulating the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

History.
Code 1919, § 3882.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions as to power of cities and towns over use of streets, etc., see Va. Const., Art. VII, §§ 8, 9.

For another section providing that public utilities not to use streets without consent, see §

15.2-2017

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
18 M.J. Surface Transportation Systems; streets, Highways, Etc., § 87.

§ 56-15.
Permits to place poles, wires, etc., in roads and streets in certain counties; charge therefor.

The governing body of Albemarle County, Chesterfield County, Henrico County, Prince William County, or York County, may adopt an ordinance requiring any person, firm or corporation to obtain a permit from the county engineer or such other officer as may
be designated in such ordinance before placing any pole or subsurface structures under, along or in any county road or street in such county which is not included within the primary state highway system or secondary system of state
highways, or any lines or wires that cross any such road or street, whether or not such road or street be actually opened, and may provide in such ordinance reasonable charges for the issuance of such a permit and penalties for
violations of the terms of such ordinance to be imposed by the court, judge or justice trying the case.

In the event the county engineer or such other officer as may be designated fails or refuses to issue any such permit requested within thirty days after application therefor, or attaches to such permit conditions to which such person, firm or corporation
is unwilling to consent, then such person, firm or corporation may proceed to make such crossing pursuant and subject to the provisions of §§ 56-23 to 56-32, as if the application had been made to the board of supervisors or other
governing body of the county.

The provisions of this section shall not apply with regard to the occupancy and use of any public roads, works, turnpikes, streets, avenues, and alleys by a renewable generator that has acquired the authority to locate distribution facilities therein
pursuant to Chapter 29 (§ 56-614 et seq.) of Title 56.

History.
1942, p. 222; Michie Code 1942, § 3885a; 2007, c. 813; 2009, c. 807.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “primary state highway system” was substituted for “state highway system” to conform to changes by Acts 2014, c. 805.

Effective October 1, 2021, “Chapter 29 (§ 56-614 et seq.) of Title 56” was substituted for “Chapter 11 (§ 67-1100 et seq) of Title 67” to conform to the recodification of Title 67 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code
Commission.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “The governing body of Albemarle County, Chesterfield County, Henrico County, Prince William County, or York County” for “The board of supervisors or other governing body of any county adjoining a city having a
population of 175,000 inhabitants or more according to the last preceding United States census, or of any county which has adopted the county executive form of county government” at the beginning of the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 807 designated the former first and second paragraphs as present subsections A and B, respectively; in subsection A, substituted “state highway system” for “primary”; and added subsection C.